North Dakota, session 69, HB1439.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-19-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
15.1-19-09. Students - Suspension and expulsion - Rules.
1. The board of a school district shall adopt rules regarding the suspension and
expulsion of a student. The rules for expulsion must provide for a procedural due
process hearing in the manner provided for inunder subsection 2 of section
15.1-19-10, before the determination to expel a student is made. A student's parent or
representative must be allowed to participate in the expulsion hearing.
2. A school district may suspend a student may be suspended for up to ten days for
insubordination, habitual indolence, disorderly conduct, or for violating a school district
weapons policy.
3. A school district may suspend a student who is enrolled in an alternative education
program for which state per student payments are available may be suspended for up
to twenty days for insubordination, habitual indolence, disorderly conduct, or for
violating a school district weapons policy.
4. A school district may expel a student, including one enrolled in an alternative
education program, may be expelled from schoolfor up to twelve months for
insubordination, habitual indolence, or disorderly conduct; provided the expulsion does
not last beyond the termination of the current school year. A student who violates, or
for violating the school district's weapons policy may be expelled for up to twelve
months. The school district shall consider the severity of the infraction, the age of the
Page No. 1 25.1197.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
student, and the disciplinary history of the student to determine the duration of the
expulsion. If the student satisfies the conditions for reinstatement established by the
school district, if any, the school district may review and reduce the duration of the
expulsion.
Page No. 2 25.1197.01000